District of Columbia statutes.
46-303.03

Application of law of the District.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, a responding tribunal of the District shall:

(1)

Apply the procedural and substantive law generally applicable to similar proceedings originating in the District and may exercise all powers and provide all remedies available in those proceedings; and

(2)

Determine the duty of support and the amount payable in accordance with the law and support guidelines of the District.

History

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 303, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(c)(3), 53 DCR 3634

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-343.3.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-137, in par. (1), deleted “, including the rules on choice of law,” following “substantive law”.

Effective Dates

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 303 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).

This section is based upon § 303 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (1996 Act).